Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.100

Reports, minutes.

The joint committee may make reports from time to time to the members of the legislature and to the public with respect to any of its findings or recommendations. The joint committee shall keep complete minutes of its meetings.

[ 1996 c 288 s 19; 1987 c 505 s 45; 1975 1st ex.s. c 293 s 16; 1951 c 43 s 6.]